District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
28 act may be cited as the "Shared Housing Agreements and Resolution Effort Pilot Program
29 Amendment Act of 2026".
30 Sec 2. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
31 Official Code §42-3501.01 et seq.) is amended as follows:
32 (a) A new Title V-C is added to read as follows:
33 "TITLE V-C. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE SHARED HOUSING AGREEMENTS AND
34 RESOLUTION EFFORT PILOT PROGRAM.
1

35 "Sec. 536. Establishment of the SHARE Pilot Program
36 "(a) In Fiscal Year 2028, the Department of Housing and Community Development
37 ("Department") shall establish a Shared Housing Agreements and Resolution Effort (“SHARE”)
38 Pilot Program ("pilot") to operate a residential eviction diversion program to facilitate dispute
39 resolution in certain cases between landlords and tenants prior to the filing of an eviction notice
40 on the basis of nonpayment of rent.
41 "(b)(1) The Department shall establish an application process through which a housing
42 provider may apply to enroll one or more specified residential rental properties in the pilot
43 program.
44 “(2) An application may be submitted by:
45 "(A) The owner of the residential rental property; or
46 "(B) A property manager or other authorized agent acting with the written
47 authorization of the owner.
48 "(3) The Department may enroll residential rental properties containing no more than
49 [2,000] rental units in the aggregate.
50 "(4) In selecting residential rental properties for participation, the Department shall
51 ensure, to the extent applications permit, that the pilot includes, at a minimum:
52 "(A) One fully affordable residential rental property;
53 "(B) One fully market-rate residential rental property; and
54 "(C) One mixed-income residential rental property.
55 "(5) For purposes of this subsection:
2

56 "(A) A “fully affordable residential rental property” means a residential rental
57 property in which all rental units are subject to income or rent restrictions imposed pursuant to
58 federal or District law, a recorded covenant, subsidy agreement, or another binding affordability
59 restriction;
60 "(B) A “fully market-rate residential rental property” means a residential rental
61 property in which no rental units are subject to the affordability restrictions described in
62 subparagraph (A), excluding inclusionary zoning units; and
63 "(C) A “mixed-income residential rental property” means a residential rental
64 property containing both rental units subject to the affordability restrictions described in
65 subparagraph (A), excluding inclusionary zoning units; and rental units that are not subject to
66 such restrictions.
67 "(6) The Department shall consider the applicant's commitment to community
68 engagement and the extent to which the selected properties will allow the Department to evaluate
69 the pilot across different property types, tenant populations, and affordability levels.
70 "(7) A housing provider shall be considered a participant in the pilot only with respect to
71 a residential rental property approved by the Department. Approval of a residential rental
72 property shall not subject any other property owned or managed by the same housing provider to
73 the requirements of this title.
74 "(c)(1) No later than December 1, 2027, the Department shall issue a grant to a
75 community organization ("grantee") to implement the pilot program. To be eligible for a grant,
76 an applicant shall:
77 "(A) Be located in the District;
3

78 "(B) Be a nonprofit organization with a 501(c)(3) status, as determined by the
79 Internal Revenue Service;
80 "(C) Demonstrate familiarity with housing law in the District; and
81 "(D) Demonstrate ability to provide mediation by trained mediators or execute
82 sub-contracts for the purpose of mediation with a nonprofit organization with a 501(c)(3) status,
83 as determined by the Internal Revenue Service;
84 "(E) Demonstrate ability to collect data on the following:
85 "(A) Total number of cases;
86 "(B) Number of cases per Ward;
87 "(C) Household demographic information;
88 "(D) Number of elderly or disabled people in each household;
89 "(E) Whether the household receives government subsidy;
90 "(F) Number of cases that reached resolution, broken down by outcome;
91 "(G) Average arrearage per case;
92 "(H) Average time to resolution;
93 "(I) Total amount of rent forgiven;
94 "(J) Average amount of Housing Stability Fund awards;
95 "(K) Participant satisfaction;
96 "(L) Agreement violations reported;
4

97 "(M) Housing retention rate at 6 and 12 months; and
98 "(N) Repeat participation.
99 "(3) Grantees shall share the data with the Department, the Council, and any third-
100 party evaluator.
101 "(d)(1) If a housing provider seeks to evict a tenant residing at a residential property
102 participating in the pilot program for nonpayment of rent and the amount owed is greater than
103 $600, pursuant to section 501(a-1)(1) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985
104 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code §42-3501.01(a-1)(1)), and is less than the lesser of either
105 $6,000 or three months' of the tenant's monthly rent obligation, the housing provider shall send a
106 Notice of Diversion Rights to the tenant at the same time as the intent to file pursuant to section
107 501(a-1).
108 "(2) The housing provider shall also file the Notice of Diversion Rights with the
109 grantee.
110 "(3) The Notice of Diversion Rights shall contain the following or substantively
111 similar language:
112 '[Housing provider name] is participating in the SHARE Eviction Mediation Pilot
113 Program. Based on the amount of rent you owe, you are eligible to participate in the program.
114 The SHARE Program provides mediation services designed to help tenants and housing
115 providers work toward an agreements and, in some cases, financial assistance for tenants before
116 the initial hearing in an eviction case. A representative from the program will reach out to you.'
5

117 "(d) Upon receipt of the Notice of Diversion Rights, the grantee shall contact the tenant
118 within 7 days to conduct intake.
119 "(e) In the event of an agreement between parties, the terms of the agreement shall be
120 written and signed by all parties, and a copy of the agreement shall be provided to the tenant, the
121 housing provider, and filed with the Court.
122 "(1) Settlement agreement terms may include:
123 "(A) Repayment agreement;
124 "(B) Move-out agreement;
125 "(C) Lease modification;
126 "(D) Repair plan;
127 "(E) Rent debt forgiveness;
128 "(F) Financial assistance pursuant to section 537 of this title.
129 "(h)(1) The grantee shall issue a Certificate of Completion stating that the requirements
130 of the SHARE Pilot Program applicable to the housing provider have been completed if:
131 “(A) The housing provider and tenant reach an agreement within 21 days;
132 “(B) The mediation fails to reach an agreement within 21 days with good
133 faith participation from all parties;
134 "(C) The tenant does not respond to the grantee's outreach; or
135 "(D) The tenant declines to participate in mediation.
6

136 "(2) A housing provider shall not file an action for possession based on nonpayment of
137 rent against an eligible tenant residing at a residential rental property participating in the pilot
138 program until the grantee issues a Certificate of Completion for the case, unless otherwise
139 authorized by Mayoral rule.
140 "(3) Paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not apply to an action for possession filed
141 before the tenant or residential rental property became subject to the requirements of the SHARE
142 Pilot Program.
143 "(i) A housing provider with a residential rental property participating in the pilot
144 program shall not delay commencement of the SHARE process for an eligible tenant to avoid
145 applicability of this title.
146 "Sec. 537. Establishment of the SHARE Program Assistance Fund and access to repair
147 funds.
148 "(a)(1) There is established a special fund named the SHARE Program Assistance Fund
149 ("Fund") which shall be administered by the Department.
150 "(A) The Fund shall consist of appropriations made by the Council, grants,
151 gifts, donations, and any other funds directed to the Fund.
152 "(B) Money in the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of
153 the District at the end of a fiscal year but shall remain available for the purposes set forth in this
154 section, subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan.
155 "(2) The Department may award assistance to support implementation of an
156 executed mediation agreement under section 536 of this title including:
7

157 "(A) Rental assistance paid to the housing provider to cover a tenant's
158 back rent, provided that the assistance shall cover no more than one third of the total amount of
159 amount owed and the housing provider agrees to forgive at least one third of the amount owed;
160 or
161 "(B) Moving expenses for the tenant to relocate under a move-out
162 agreement, including the cost of hiring a moving crew or truck, security deposit, or rental
163 application fees.
164 "(3)(A) A tenant shall not be eligible for Fund assistance more than twice.
165 "(i) Ineligibility for Fund assistance under this subsection does not
166 disqualify the tenant from eligibility for the SHARE Program mediation services and the
167 opportunity to reach a settlement agreement that does not include Fund assistance.
168 "(4)(A) Payments from the Fund to housing providers shall not be issued until an
169 agreement is signed by all parties.
170 "(B) The Mayor shall issue rules regarding compliance actions that the
171 housing provider and tenant must complete prior to receiving any disbursements.
172 "(b) The Department shall prioritize residential rental properties participating in the
173 SHARE Program, or housing providers with respect to those participating properties for
174 stabilization funding from the Housing Production Trust Fund for repairs directly related to
175 housing code violations identified in SHARE cases, provided that the housing provider clearly
176 demonstrates that the funds are necessary for the repairs to be made.
177 "Sec 538. Establishment of the SHARE Program grants
8

178 "(a) No later than December 1, 2027, the Department may award grants, subject to the
179 availability of funds, to community-based organizations to provide housing counseling services
180 or same-day legal representation to tenants in the SHARE program.
181 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
182 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
183 impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
184 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
185 Sec. 4. Effective date.
186 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
187 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
188 provided in sections 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
189 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
190 Columbia Register.
191
192
9